Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2401
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2401 to 38-2426 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 816;

Laws 2013, LB42, § 1.